Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6318
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-6318 to 71-6331.01 shall be known and may be cited as the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 166;

Laws 1995, LB 147, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1260.

Lead-based paint removal, credentialing provisions, see sections 38-1,119 to 38-1,123.